Florida, session 2026, SB904.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 316.2068, Florida 11 Statutes, is amended to read: 12 316.2068âElectric personal assistive mobility devices; 13 regulations.â 14 (4)âA person who is under the age of 18 16 years may not 15 operate, ride, or otherwise be propelled on an electric personal 16 assistive mobility device unless the person wears a bicycle 17 helmet that is properly fitted, that is fastened securely upon 18 his or her head by a strap, and that meets the standards of the 19 American National Standards Institute (ANSI Z Bicycle Helmet 20 Standards), the standards of the Snell Memorial Foundation (1984 21 Standard for Protective Headgear for Use in Bicycling), or any 22 other nationally recognized standards for bicycle helmets which 23 are adopted by the department. 24 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.